da: Softbox-form: Oktagon; Rektangel; Rund; Firkant; Strip; Andet
de: Form der Softbox: Achteck; Rechteck; Rund; Quadrat; Streifen; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Formă softbox: Octogonală; Dreptunghiulară; Rotundă; Pătrată; Bandă; Altele
ko: 소프트박스 모양: 팔각형; 직사각형; 라운드; 스퀘어; 조각; 기타
th: รูปร่างซอฟต์บ็อกซ์: แปดเหลี่ยม; สี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; ทรงกลม; ทรงเหลี่ยม; แถบ; อื่นๆ
nb: Softbox-form: Oktagon; Rektangel; Rund; Firkantet; Stripe; Annet
nl: Softbox-vorm: Achthoek; Rechthoek; Rond; Vierkant; Strip; Andere
sv: Bouncerform: Oktagon; Rektangel; Rund; Fyrkantig; Remsa; Övrigt
it: Forma del softbox: Ottagono; Rettangolo; Rotondo; Quadrato; Nastro; Altro
hu: Softbox formája: Nyolcszög; Szögletes; Kerek; Négyzet; Szalag; Egyéb
en: Softbox shape: Octagon; Rectangle; Round; Square; Strip; Other
zh-CN: 柔光箱形状: 八边形; 长方形; 圆头; 方形; 条形; 其他
pt-BR: Formato do softbox: Octógono; Retângulo; Redondo; Quadrado; Faixa; Outro
ja: ソフトボックスの形状: 八角形; 長方形; ラウンド; スクエア; ストリップ; その他
pl: Kształt softboksa: Oktagon; Prostokąt; Runda; Kwadrat; Taśma; Inne
fr: Forme de la boîte à lumière: Octogone; Rectangle; Rond; Carré; Bande; Autre
fi: Tasovalon muoto: Kahdeksankulmio; Suorakulmio; Pyöreä; Neliömäinen; Liuska; Muu
es: Forma de softbox: Octágono; Rectángulo; Redondo; Cuadrado; Banda; Otros
bg-BG: Форма на софтбокс: Осмоъгълник; Правоъгълник; Кръгъл; Квадратен; Strip; Други
sl-SI: Oblika softboxa: Osmerokotnik; Pravokotna; Okrogla; Kvadratna; Trak; Drugo
ru: Форма софтбокса: Октагон; Прямоугольный; Круглый; Квадратный; Полоса; Другое
vi: Hình dạng hộp làm mềm ánh sáng: Hình bát giác; Chữ nhật; Mũi giày tròn; Mũi giày vuông; Dải; Khác
lt-LT: Šviesadėžės forma: Aštuonkampis; Stačiakampis; Apvalus; Kvadratas; Juosta; Kita
sk-SK: Tvar softboxu: Osemuholníkový; Obdĺžnikový; Okrúhly; Hranatý; Strip; Iné
pt-PT: Formato de softbox: Octógono; Retângulo; Redondo; Quadrado; Faixa; Outro
el: Σχήμα softbox: Οκτάγωνο; Ορθογώνιο παραλληλόγραμμο; Στρογγυλό; Τετράγωνο; Λωρίδα; Άλλο
cs: Tvar softboxu: Osmiúhelník; Obdélník; Oválná; Čtvercová; Proužek; Jiné
hr-HR: Oblik softboxa: Osmerokut; Pravokutni; Okrugli; Kvadratni; Traka; Ostalo
zh-TW: 柔光箱形狀: 八邊形; 長方; 圓頭; 方頭; 直條; 其他
tr: Softbox şekli: Sekizgen; Dikdörtgen; Yuvarlak; Kare; Şerit; Diğer